Illinois, session 104th, SB2869.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 2.3 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/2.3 new)7    Sec. 2.3. Annual reports on missing youth in care.8    On or before June 1, 2027, and every year thereafter, the 9Department shall submit to the General Assembly an annual 10report on (i) the total number of youth in care who were 11classified as missing by the Department during the previous 12calendar year and (ii) the number of missing youth in care 13reported in item (i) who were later located or recovered by the 14Department. For each youth in care reported under item (i), 15the Department shall provide the following information:16        (1) Age, gender, type of placement the youth was 17    placed in before the youth was classified as missing, 18    total length of time the youth has been under the 19    Department's custody or guardianship, and any other 20    relevant information.21        (2) The date upon which the youth was first classified 22    as missing by the Department. 23        (3) The circumstances leading up to the Department   SB2869- 2 -LRB104 16418 KTG 29808 b1    classifying the youth as missing.2        (4) Actions taken by the Department to locate or 3    recover the youth, including a list of all Department 4    records or forms created or completed on the youth and a 5    list of all agencies the Department notified about the 6    youth, including, but not limited to, notifications made 7    to the appropriate local law enforcement agency and the 8    National Center for Missing and Exploited Children. 9        (5) If the youth was later located or recovered, the 10    date on which the Department located or recovered the 11    youth. 12    All information collected, shared, stored, or reported on 13in accordance with this Section shall be handled in accordance 14with all applicable State and federal privacy laws and 15regulations and redacted where appropriate.